California statutes. Water Code
(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the Technical Assistance Account is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the state department, to provide technical assistance to public water systems in the state in accordance with Section 300j-12(g)(2) of the federal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1452(g)(2)). For the purposes of this section, “technical assistance” includes assistance to disadvantaged communities, including Indian
 tribes.

(b) In carrying out its responsibilities under subdivision (a), the state department may do any of the following:

(1) Assess the technical, managerial, and financial capability of a disadvantaged community.

(2) Assist an applicant in the preparation of an application for funding under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 116760) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 300j-12(i) of the federal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1452(i)).

(3) Conduct workshops in locations in or near disadvantaged communities to provide information regarding grants or loans for the design and construction of projects for public water systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79026.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the account may be used to pay costs incurred in connection with the administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Flood Protection Program [79030. - 79069.12.]



  ARTICLE 1. Flood Protection Account [79030. - 79031.]

79030.

For the purposes of this chapter, “account” means the Flood Protection Account created by Section 79031.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79031.

The Flood Protection Account is hereby created in the fund. The sum of two hundred ninety-two million dollars ($292,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Floodplain Mapping Program [79033. - 79033.6.]

79033.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Floodplain Mapping Subaccount.

(b) The sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the Floodplain Mapping Subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79033.2.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Agriculture and Open Space Mapping Subaccount.

(b) The sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the Agriculture and Open Space Mapping Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79033.4.

The money in the Floodplain Mapping Subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, may be used by the department for the purpose of assisting local land-use planning, and to avoid or reduce future flood risks and damages. The use of the funds in that subaccount by the department shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Mapping newly identified floodplains.

(b) Mapping rural areas with potential for urbanization.

(c) Mapping flood hazard areas with undefined 100-year flood elevations.

(d) Updating outdated floodplain maps.

(e) Accelerating mapping of riverine floodplains, alluvial fans, and coastal flood hazard areas.

(f) Collecting topographic and hydrographic survey data.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79033.6.

(a) The money in the Agriculture and Open Space Mapping Subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the Department of Conservation, may be used by the Department of Conservation for the purposes of assisting local land-use planning by making available Important Farmland Series maps and Interim Farmland maps, as those terms are defined in Section 65560 of the Government Code. The information provided by the Department of Conservation is intended for local government use in conjunction with floodplain and flood hazard maps developed by the department to protect agricultural land resources coincident with avoidance or reduction of future flood risk and damage to residential or commercial land
 uses. The use of the funds in that subaccount by the Department of Conservation shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Accelerating production of Important Farmland Series maps and Interim Farmland maps.

(2) Increasing the coverage and availability of soil surveys conducted by the United States Natural Resources Conservation Service.

(3) Increasing topographic, soil, and agricultural crop data collection and enhancing data gathering capability.

(4) Developing integrated mapping that incorporates Important Farmland Series mapping and Interim Farmland mapping data with other relevant information, including, but not limited to, floodplain
 or flood hazard information, planning designation, and other land and natural resource data.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “maps” and “mapping” may include digital map files.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 434, Sec. 12.   (SB 732)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Flood Protection Corridor Program [79035. - 79044.9.]

79035.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Flood Protection Corridor Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Flood Protection Corridor Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79036.

The sum of seventy million dollars ($70,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79037.

(a) The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, may be used by the department for flood control projects through direct expenditure for the acquisition, restoration, enhancement, and protection of real property for the purposes of flood control protection, agricultural land preservation, and wildlife habitat protection, and for grants to local public agencies or nonprofit organizations for these purposes, and for related administrative
 costs.

(b) The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used for the protection, creation, and enhancement of flood protection corridors through all of the following actions:

(1) Acquiring easements and other interests in real property from willing sellers to protect or enhance flood protection corridors and floodplains while preserving or enhancing the agricultural use of the real property.

(2) Setting back existing flood control levees and, in conjunction with undertaking those setbacks, strengthening or modifying existing levees.

(3) Acquiring interests in real property from willing sellers located in a floodplain that cannot reasonably be made safe from future flooding.

(4) Acquiring easements and other interests in real property from willing sellers to protect or enhance flood protection corridors while preserving or enhancing the wildlife value of the real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79038.

(a) For the purposes of this article, the department shall give highest priority to projects that include either of the following:

(1) Projects that have been assigned high priority for completion by the department for flood protection purposes and by the Department of Conservation for purposes of preserving agricultural land in accordance with the Agricultural Land Stewardship Program Act of 1995 (Division 10.2
 (commencing with Section 10200) of the Public Resources Code).

(2) Projects that have been assigned high priority for completion by the department for flood protection purposes and by the Department of Fish and Game for wildlife habitat protection or restoration purposes.

(b) For restoration, enhancement, and protection projects, the services of the California Conservation Corps or community conservation corps shall be used whenever feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79039.

(a) In order to ensure that property acquired under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 79037 remains on the county tax rolls and in agricultural use to the greatest extent practicable, the acquisition of easements shall be the preferred method of acquiring property interests under that paragraph unless the acquisition of a fee interest is required for management purposes or the landowner will only consider the sale of a fee interest in the land. No acquisition of a
 fee interest shall be undertaken under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 79037 until all practical alternatives have been considered by the department.

(b) Any proceeds received from the disposal of a fee interest acquired under this article shall be deposited into the subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79040.

Any acquisition pursuant to this article shall be from a willing seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79041.

Prior to acquiring an easement or other interest in land pursuant to this article, the project shall include a plan to minimize the impact on adjacent landowners. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, an evaluation of the impact on floodwaters, the structural integrity of affected levees, diversion facilities, customary agricultural husbandry practices, and timber extraction operations, and an evaluation with regard to the maintenance required of any facilities that are proposed to be
 constructed or altered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79042.

Prior to acquiring an easement or other interest in land pursuant to this article, a public hearing in the local community shall be held. Notification shall be given to the county board of supervisors of the affected county, adjacent landowners, affected water districts, local municipalities, and other interested parties, as determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79043.

Money in the subaccount may be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to repair breaches in the flood control system developed pursuant to this article or caused by the development of an easement program financed through this section and to repair water diversion facilities or flood control facilities damaged by a project developed pursuant to this section or financed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79044.

(a) (1) In expending grant money pursuant to this article to acquire an interest in any particular parcel of land, a local public agency or nonprofit organization may use the money to establish a trust fund in the amount of not more than 20 percent of the amount of money paid for the acquisition. Interest from the trust fund shall be used only to maintain the lands that are acquired pursuant to this chapter.

(2) A local public agency or nonprofit organization that acquires land with money from the subaccount and transfers the land to another public agency or nonprofit organization shall also transfer the ownership of the trust fund that was established to maintain that land.

(b) If the local public agency or nonprofit organization does not establish a trust fund pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall certify to the department that it can maintain the land to be acquired from funds otherwise available to the agency or organization.

(c) This section does not apply to state agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79044.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to address the problem of soaring federal flood insurance rates by assisting local governments to meet technical requirements for participation in the National Flood Insurance Program and the National Flood Insurance Program’s Community Rating System.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, of the funds transferred pursuant to Section 79036, the sum of
 one million dollars ($1,000,000) is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department, as follows:

(1) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to educate and provide technical assistance to cities and counties regarding the National Flood Insurance Program and the enrollment process.

(2) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to educate and provide technical assistance to cities and counties currently enrolled in the National Flood Insurance Program with regard to the National Flood Insurance Program’s Community Rating System and the implementation of activities creditable under that system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79044.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, shall be allocated by the department to the City of Santee for the purposes of flood protection for streets and highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79044.7.

Not more than 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79044.9.

The department may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Delta Levee Rehabilitation Program [79045. - 79052.]

79045.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Delta Levee Rehabilitation Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Delta Levee Rehabilitation Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79046.

The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article pursuant to Section 12986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79047.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department, as follows:

(a) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for local assistance under the delta levee maintenance subventions program under Part 9 (commencing with Section 12980) of Division 6, and for the administration of that assistance.

(b) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for special flood protection projects under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12310) of Part 4.8 of Division 6, subsidence studies and monitoring, and for the administration of this subdivision. Allocation of these funds shall be for flood protection projects on Bethel, Bradford, Holland, Hotchkiss, Jersey, Sherman, Twitchell, and Webb Islands, and at other locations in the delta.

(c) Any funds that are made available under subdivision (a) may be used to reimburse local agencies for the state’s share of costs for eligible projects completed on or after July 1, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79048.

The expenditure of funds under this article is subject to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 12306) of Part 4.8 of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79049.

Of the funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 79047, not more than 5 percent may be expended by the department to repair levee road pavement if the damage is attributable to flood control maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79050.

No expenditure of funds may be made under this article unless the Department of Fish and Game makes a written determination as part of its review and approval of a plan or project pursuant to Section 12314 or 12987. The Department of Fish and Game shall make its determination in a reasonable and timely manner following the submission of the project or plan to that department. For the purposes of this article, an expenditure may include more than one levee project or plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79051.

For the purposes of this article, a levee project includes levee improvements and related habitat improvements undertaken in the delta at a location other than the location of that levee improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79052.

Following the date on which a program for the bay-delta is adopted by CALFED, the remaining funds in the subaccount shall be used for levee rehabilitation improvement projects that, to the greatest extent possible, are consistent with the program adopted by CALFED.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Flood Control Subventions Program [79055. - 79057.]

79055.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Flood Control Subventions Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Flood Control Subventions Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79056.

The sum of forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79057.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department to pay for the state’s share of the nonfederal costs of flood control and flood prevention projects adopted and authorized as of January 1, 1999, under The State Water Resources Law of 1945 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639)
 of Part 6 of Division 6), The Flood Control Law of 1946 (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12800) of Part 6 of Division 6), and The California Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12850) of Part 6 of Division 6), including the credits and loans to local agencies pursuant to Sections 12585.3 and 12585.4, subdivision (d) of Section 12585.5, and Sections 12866.3 and 12866.4, and to implement Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 12840) of Part 6 of Division 6.

(b) The money in the subaccount shall be allocated only to projects in the Counties of Contra Costa, Fresno, Kern, Los Angeles, Marin, Napa, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, Santa Clara, Sonoma, and Ventura.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the state’s share of the nonfederal costs of projects for flood control and flood prevention adopted and authorized
 after January 1, 2001, shall not exceed that portion of the nonfederal costs authorized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) of Part 6 or any amendments thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Urban Stream Restoration Program [79060. - 79062.5.]

79060.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Urban Stream Restoration Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Urban Stream Restoration Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79061.

The sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79062.

The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, may be used by the department for both of the following:

(a) Grants to local agencies and nonprofit organizations for effective, low-cost flood control projects pursuant to Section 7048.

(b) Grants to local community conservation corps and other nonprofit corporations for local stream
 clearance, flood mitigation, and cleanup activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79062.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, regulations set forth in Chapter 2.4 (commencing with Section 451.1) of Division 2 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations that are in effect on March 8, 2000, may be used to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Capital Area Flood Protection Program [79065. - 79065.8.]

79065.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Since Sacramento, the state capital, was founded over 150 years ago, it has suffered from flood disasters because of inadequate flood protection. Each year, the State Capitol and more than 1,300 other government-owned buildings and infrastructure of the capital region are at risk because of their location in the worst protected urban area in the country.

(b) The State of California’s investment of money and other resources in the state’s seat of government is important to preserve and protect.

(c) It is in the best interest of this state to invest in a cost-shared program to protect life and property in the state capital from flooding, thus resulting in opportunities for sustainable economic development and continued protection of the state’s natural resources.

(d) The Congress and the President of the United States have recognized the national importance of increasing the level of the state capital’s flood protection by authorizing projects in the Water Resources Development Act of 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79065.2.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the State Capital Protection Subaccount.

(b) For purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the State Capital Protection Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79065.4.

The sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79065.6.

The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the Sacramento Area Flood Control Agency, may be used by the Sacramento Area Flood Control Agency to pay the state’s share of the costs of flood management projects authorized by the United States to improve the level of flood protection in the state capital region.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79065.8.

No money deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. San Lorenzo River Flood Control Program [79067. - 79067.4.]

79067.

(a)There is hereby created in the account the San Lorenzo River Flood Control Subaccount.

(b) For purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the San Lorenzo River Flood Control Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79067.2.

The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79067.4.

The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, shall be allocated by the department to the City of Santa Cruz to pay for the state’s share of the costs of flood management projects authorized by the United States to improve the level of flood protection in the Santa Cruz region.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Yuba Feather Flood Protection Program [79068. - 79068.20.]

79068.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this article.

(a) “Nonstructural improvements” are projects that are intended to reduce or eliminate susceptibility to flooding by preserving or increasing the flood-carrying capacity of floodways, and include such measures as levees, setback levees, floodproofing structures, and zoning, designating, or acquiring flood prone
 areas.

(b) “Structural improvements” are projects that are intended to modify flood patterns and rely primarily on constructed components, and include such measures as levees, floodwalls, and improved channels.

(c) “Subaccount” means the Yuba Feather Flood Protection Subaccount created by Section 79068.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79068.2.

There is hereby created in the account the Yuba Feather Flood Protection Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79068.4.

The sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79068.6.

Seventy million dollars ($70,000,000) in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department or Reclamation Board, shall be used by the department or Reclamation Board to fund one or more of the following flood protection projects to be implemented by a local public entity that has legal authority and jurisdiction to implement a flood control program along the Yuba and Feather Rivers and their tributaries:

(a) The construction or improvements of weirs, bypasses, and channels.

(b) The construction of levees or improving publicly maintained levees, including, but not limited to, setback levees, training walls, floodwalls, and streambank protection projects, which provide flood protection or flood damage reduction.

(c) The modification or reoperation of existing dams and waterworks, including spillways or other capital outlay facilities, for the purpose of increased efficiency in managing flood waters.

(d) The installation of tailwater suppression systems, detention basins, relief wells, test wells, flood warning systems, and telemetry devices.

(e) The relocation or floodproofing of structures within floodplains, which meet or exceed a
 community’s floodplain regulations, pursuant to the National Flood Insurance Program.

(f) Implementation of watershed projects, which provide flood protection or flood damage reduction.

(g) The construction of, or improvement to, a state or interstate highway, county road, or a levee road, that is designated a flood emergency evacuation route, or that provides access to a levee for emergency vehicles, flood fights, or levee repair and maintenance, or a project that protects such a road or highway.

(h) The purchase of lands, easements, and rights-of-way.

(i) Capital costs of environmental mitigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79068.8.

No expenditures of state funds may be made under this article until the department or the Reclamation Board determines that all of the following requirements have been met:

(a) There is a final environmental document prepared pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (commencing with Section 21000 of the Public Resources Code).

(b) The project is in
 compliance with the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), as demonstrated by documentation such as comments received from the Department of Fish and Game, a permit obtained from the Department of Fish and Game or other appropriate evidence.

(c) The local project proponent agrees to pay at least that portion of the nonfederal capital costs of the project required by Section 12585.5.

(d) The local project proponent agrees to operate and maintain the completed project.

(e) The local project proponent enters into an agreement indemnifying and holding the state, its agencies, officers and employees free and harmless from any and all liability arising out of the design, construction, operation and maintenance of the project.

(f) The project is recommended for implementation by the department or the Reclamation Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79068.10.

All of the following factors shall be considered by the department and the Reclamation Board for prioritizing projects:

(a) Potential loss of life from flooding.

(b) Increased flood protection or flood damage reduction for areas that have the greatest flood risk or have experienced repetitive flood loss.

(c) The local community is a small community with financial hardship.

(d) Projects that provide multiple benefits.

(e) Projects that are implemented in accordance with the Sacramento/San Joaquin River Basins Comprehensive Study.

(f) Projects that are implemented pursuant to the completion of feasibility studies conducted by the United States Army Corps of Engineers or local agencies.

(g) Projects along the Yuba and Feather Rivers and their tributaries.

(h) Projects that address regional flood problems.

(i) Projects along the Colusa Drain and its tributaries.

(j) Minimizing impacts to the environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79068.12.

Of the fund appropriated pursuant to Section 79068.6, two million six hundred thousand dollars ($2,600,000) in the subaccount shall be used for the local share of levee repairs and enhancements in Sutter County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79068.14.

(a) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in the subaccount, upon appropriation to the Department of Fish and Game, may be used by that department, if it determines that any flood control project undertaken pursuant to this article would result in a reduction of, or damage to, fish, wildlife, or riparian habitat, to protect, improve, restore, create, or enhance fish, wildlife, and riparian habitat of a comparable type to that which was reduced or damaged.

(b) Any land acquired pursuant to this section shall be acquired from willing sellers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79068.16.

If all of the funds appropriated pursuant to Section 79068.6 are encumbered, and any funds described in Section 79068.14 are not needed for the purposes of that section, as stated in writing by that department to the Legislature, the Legislature may appropriate the funds not needed for the purposes of Section 79068.14 for the purposes of Article 4 (commencing with Section 79055).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79068.18.

Not more than 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79068.20.

The department and the Reclamation Board may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Arroyo Pasajero Watershed Program [79069. - 79069.12.]

79069.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Arroyo Pasajero Watershed incurred unprecedented flooding in 1995 that resulted in a loss of lives due to a bridge failure on Interstate Highway Route 5 (I-5).

(b) Flooding in the watershed caused damage to important federal, state, and local public facilities, including the Lemoore Naval Air Station, Interstate Highway Route 5 (I-5), the
 California Aqueduct, and critical local roads and highways, as well as private property.

(c) It is of statewide importance to undertake projects to eliminate future flooding in the watershed in order to protect life and property and to protect the drinking water supply of southern California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79069.2.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern construction of this article.

(a) “Subaccount” means the Arroyo Pasajero Watershed Subaccount created pursuant to Section 79069.4.

(b) “Watershed” means the Arroyo Pasajero Watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79069.4.

There is hereby created in the account the Arroyo Pasajero Watershed Subaccount. The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79069.6.

The money in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the department, shall be used by the department for projects that improve flood protection for State Highway Route 269 in the area north of the City of Huron or improve flood control for the California Aqueduct in the area of the Arroyo Pasajero Crossing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79069.8.

For the purposes of carrying out projects pursuant to this article, the department is encouraged to utilize the services of the California Conservation Corps or community conservation corps or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79069.10.

Not more than 5 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79069.12.

The department may adopt regulations to carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Watershed Protection Program [79070. - 79104.206.]



  ARTICLE 1. Watershed Protection Account [79070. - 79071.]

79070.

For the purposes of this chapter, “account” means the Watershed Protection Account created by Section 79071.
